src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@kurgaan+N:@P.NomStem.First@kurg´aan TAUD ;
kurguhääl+N:kurgu#h´ääl%{stemill%} KEEL ;
kurguke+N:kurguke PEENIKE ;
kurgutõbi+N:kurgu#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
kuri+N:k´urJ1%>%{pl.e%} PIIM ;
kurikael+N:kuri#k´ael%>%{pl.u%} KAEL ;
kurikas+N:kurika LOHAKAS ;
kurin+N:kurin MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurioosum+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuri´oosum REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuriositeet+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuriosit´eet TAUD ;
kuristik+N:k`urist´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuristus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuristus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuritahtlikkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuri#t´ahtl´ikkus OLULINE ;
kuritarvitamine+N:kuri#tarvitamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuritarvitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuri#tarvitus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuritegevus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuri#tegevus OLULINE ;
kuritegu+N:kuri#teG1u KAVA ;
kuritõbi+N:kuri#tõB2%{stemill%} NIMI ;
kuritöö+N:kuri#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
kurivaim+N:kuri#v´aim%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
kurjajuur+N:kurja#j´uur KEEL ;
kurjategija+N:kurja#tegija AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurjus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urjus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurjustus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kurjustus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurk+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urk TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurk+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urk%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurn+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urn TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurn+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urn%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
kurnaja+N:k´urnaja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurnatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kurnatus OLULINE ;
kurnimäng+N:kurni#m´äng%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
kurnipulk+N:kurni#p´ulk%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kurortoloogia+N:kurortol´oogia AASTA ;
kurrustik+N:k`urrust´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurrutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kurrutus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kursant+N:@P.NomStem.First@kurs´an,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kursiiv+N:@P.NomStem.First@kurs´iiv TAUD ;
kursiivkiri+N:kurs´iiv#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@kursimuutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kursi#m´uutus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kursor+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´ursor REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurss+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urss TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kursus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´ursus SUULINE ;
kursusekaaslane+N:k´ursuse#k´aaslane SUULINE ;
kursusetöö+N:k´ursuse#t´öö%>%{id%} PUU ;
kursuslane+N:k´ursuslane OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurt+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urt TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurtisaan+N:@P.NomStem.First@k`urtis´aan TAUD ;
kurtmine+N:k´urtmine OLULINE ;
kurttumm+N:k´urt#t´umm%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurtumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urtumus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurtus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urtus SUULINE ;
kuru+N:kuru KAVA ;
kurultai+N:kurult´ai ARMEE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurv+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´urv TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurvameelsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kurva#m´eelsus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kurvastus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kurvastus OLULINE ;
kurvits+N:kurvits MAGUS ;
kusejuha+N:kuse#juha KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kusemürgistus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuse#mürgistus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kusemürgitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuse#mürgitus OLULINE ;
kusepidamatus+N:kuse#pidamatus SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kusetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kusetus OLULINE ;
@R.Part.One@kusi+N:@R.Part.One@kus,%{stemill%}%{rare%} MERI ;
kusija+N:kusija AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kusik+N:@P.NomStem.First@kusik VIRSIK ;
kusilane+N:kusilane OLULINE ;
kusiti+N:kusiti AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kusiveresus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kus,i#veresus OLULINE ;
kuslapuu+N:kusla#p´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@kussutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kus,sutus OLULINE ;
kustukumm+N:kustu#k´umm TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kustumatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´ustumatus SUULINE ;
kustumine+N:k´ustumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kustumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´ustumus OLULINE ;
kustutaja+N:kustutaja AASTA ;
kustutamine+N:kustutamine OLULINE ;
kustuti+N:kustuti AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kustutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kustutus OLULINE ;
kustutuskumm+N:kustutus#k´umm TAUD ;
kustutusvahend+N:kustutus#vahend REDEL ;
kutiikula+N:kut´iikula AASTA ;
kuts+N:k´ut,s TAUD ;
kutsa+N:kut,sa PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutsar+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´utsar REDEL ;
kutsealune+N:k´utse#alune SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutseharidus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´utse#haridus OLULINE ;
kutsekaart+N:k´utse#k´aart TAUD ;
kutsekaaslane+N:k´utse#k´aaslane SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutsekaaslus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´utse#k´aaslus SUULINE ;
kutsekiri+N:k´utse#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
kutsekool+N:k´utse#k´ool, TAUD ;
kutseleht+N:k´utse#l´ehT1%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutseoskus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´utse#´oskus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutsetunnistus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´utse#tun,nistus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutseõppeasutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´utse#´õppe#asutus OLULINE ;
kutsikas+N:kut,sika LOHAKAS ;
kutsu+N:kut,su PERE ;
kutsumine+N:k´utsumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutsumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´utsumus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutsung+N:@P.NomStem.First@kutsung REDEL ;
kutsutu+N:kutsutu AASTA ;
kutt+N:k´ut,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kutter+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uttE2r REDEL ;
kuu+N:k´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
kuub+N:k´uuB1%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} EIT ;
kuubalane+N:kuubalane OLULINE ;
kuubalanna+N:kuubalanna PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuubik+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuubik VIRSIK ;
kuuehõlm+N:kuue#h´õlm%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
kuuekäis+N:kuue#k´äis SOOLANE ;
kuuendik+N:k`uuend´ik ELANIK ;
kuuguar+N:kuuguar MUUSEUM ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuuik+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuuik VIRSIK ;
kuuketas+N:k´uu#k´etT1a KOTKAS ;
kuukiri+N:k´uu#k´irJ1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuul+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uul, TAUD ;
kuulaja+N:k´uulaja AASTA ;
kuulajaskond+N:k´uulajask´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
kuulamine+N:k´uulamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuular+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uular REDEL ;
kuulataja+N:kuulataja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuulatlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuulatlus OLULINE ;
kuulatlustoru+N:kuulatlus#toru%{stemill%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
kuuld+N:k´uulD1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuuldamatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uuldamatus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuuldavus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uuldavus OLULINE ;
kuuldeklapp+N:k´uulde#kl´app TAUD ;
kuuldu+N:k´uuldu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuuldus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uuldus SUULINE ;
kuule+N:k´uulD1e PINGE ;
kuule+N:k´uulE2 HAARE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuulekus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuulekus OLULINE ;
kuuletumine+N:kuuletumine OLULINE ;
kuulike+N:kuul,ike PEENIKE ;
kuulipilduja+N:kuul,i#p´ilduja AASTA ;
kuulipildur+N:kuul,i#p´ildur REDEL ;
kuuliprits+N:kuul,i#pr´it,s TAUD ;
kuulirahe+N:kuul,i#rahe PERE ;
kuulitõuge+N:kuul,i#t´õuK2e PINGE ;
kuulja+N:k´uulja AASTA ;
kuullaager+N:k´uul,#l´aagE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuulmatus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uulmatus SUULINE ;
kuulmine+N:k´uulmine SUULINE ;
kuulmismulje+N:k´uulmis#m´ul,je PINGE ;
kuulnu+N:k´uulnu AASTA ;
kuulo+N:kuulo PERE ;
kuulsulepea+N:k´uul,#sule#p´E6A6%>%{id%} PUU ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuulsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uulsus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuulsusetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uulsusetus SUULINE ;
kuulujutt+N:kuulu#j´utt%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
kuulumine+N:k´uulumine OLULINE ;
kuulutaja+N:kuulutaja AASTA ;
kuulutamine+N:kuulutamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuulutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuulutus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuuluvus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uuluvus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuum+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uum%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
kuumamine+N:k´uumamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuumarabandus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuuma#rabandus OLULINE ;
kuumaveeallikas+N:kuuma#v´ee#al,lika LOHAKAS ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuumendus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuumendus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uumus SUULINE ;
kuumutamine+N:kuumutamine OLULINE ;
kuumuti+N:kuumuti AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuumutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kuumutus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuunar+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uunar REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuup+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uup TAUD ;
kuupaiste+N:k´uu#p´aiste PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuupaistetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uu#p´aistetus OLULINE ;
kuupalk+N:k´uu#p´alk%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
kuupmeeter+N:k´uup#m´eetE2r REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@kuupuhastus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´uu#puhastus OLULINE ;
kuupäev+N:k´uu#p´äev%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
